Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-709
Insolvent bank; Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation as receiver or liquidator; enforcement of stockholders' liability.

Among its other powers, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in the performance of its powers and duties as such receiver or liquidator, shall have the right and power upon the order of a court of record of competent jurisdiction to enforce the individual liability of the stockholders and directors of any such banking institution.

Laws 1935, c. 8, § 9, p. 76;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-409;

R.S.1943, § 8-709.